Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
PART 8
WINDING UP PARTNERSHIP BUSINESS

7-64-801. Events causing dissolution and winding up of partnership business.

A partnership is dissolved, and its business shall be wound up, only upon the occurrence of any of the following events:

In a partnership at will, the partnership's having notice from a partner, other than a partner who is dissociated under section 7-64-601 (1)(b) to (1)(j), of that partner's express will to withdraw as a partner; except that, if the partnership has notice that the partner's will is to withdraw at a later date, then the dissolution shall occur at the later date stated by the partner;

In a partnership for a definite term or particular undertaking:

Within ninety days after a partner's wrongful dissociation under section 7-64-602 (2) or a partner's dissociation by death or otherwise under section 7-64-601 (1)(f) to (1)(j), the express will of at least half of the remaining partners to wind up the partnership business, for which purpose a partner's rightful dissociation, pursuant to section 7-64-602 (2)(b)(I), constitutes the expression of that partner's will;

The express will of all of the partners to wind up the partnership business; or

The expiration of the term or the completion of the undertaking;

An event agreed to in the partnership agreement resulting in the winding up of the partnership business;

An event that makes it unlawful for all or substantially all of the business of the partnership to be continued, but a cure of illegality within ninety days after the partnership has notice of the event is effective retroactively to the date of the event for purposes of this section;

On application by a partner, a judicial determination that:

The economic purpose of the partnership is likely to be unreasonably frustrated;

Another partner has engaged in conduct relating to the partnership business which makes it not reasonably practicable to carry on the business in partnership with that partner;

It is not otherwise reasonably practicable to carry on the partnership business in conformity with the partnership agreement; or

The partnership is not reasonably likely to pay liabilities against which it indemnifies the dissociated partner;

On application by a transferee of a partner's transferable interest, a judicial determination that it is equitable to wind up the partnership business:

After the expiration of the term or completion of the undertaking, if the partnership was for a definite term or particular undertaking at the time of the transfer or entry of the charging order that gave rise to the transfer; or

At any time, if the partnership was a partnership at will at the time of the transfer or entry of the charging order that gave rise to the transfer.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 891, § 1, effective January 1, 1998.

L. 2003:

(1)(a) amended, p. 2254, § 160, effective July 1, 2004.

7-64-802. Partnership continues after dissolution.

Subject to subsection (2) of this section, a partnership continues after dissolution only for the purpose of winding up its business. The partnership is terminated when the winding up of its business is completed.

At any time after the dissolution of a partnership and before the winding up of its business is completed, all of the partners, including any dissociating partner other than a wrongfully dissociating partner, may waive the right to have the partnership's business wound up and the partnership terminated. In that event:

The partnership resumes carrying on its business as if dissolution had never occurred, and any debt, obligation, or liability incurred by the partnership or a partner after the dissolution and before the waiver is determined as if dissolution had never occurred; and

The rights of a third party accruing under section 7-64-804 (1) or arising out of conduct in reliance on the dissolution before the third party has notice of the waiver may not be adversely affected.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 892, § 1, effective January 1, 1998.

7-64-803. Right to wind up partnership business.

After dissolution, a partner who has not wrongfully dissociated may participate in winding up the partnership's business, but on application of any partner, partner's legal representative, or transferee, the district court, for good cause shown, may order judicial supervision of the winding up.

The legal representative of the last surviving partner may wind up a partnership's business.

A person winding up a partnership's business may preserve the partnership business or property as a going concern for a reasonable time, prosecute and defend actions and proceedings, whether civil, criminal, or administrative, settle disputes, settle and close the partnership's business, dispose of and transfer the partnership's property, discharge or provide for the partnership obligations, distribute the assets of the partnership pursuant to section 7-64-807, and perform other necessary acts.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 892, § 1, effective January 1, 1998.

7-64-804. Partner's power to bind partnership after dissolution.

Subject to section 7-64-805, a partnership is bound by a partner's act after dissolution that:

Is appropriate for winding up the partnership business; or

Would have bound the partnership under section 7-64-301 before dissolution, if the other party to the transaction did not have notice of the dissolution.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 893, § 1, effective January 1, 1998.

7-64-805. Statement of dissolution.

After dissolution, a partner who has not wrongfully dissociated may deliver to the secretary of state, for filing pursuant to part 3 of article 90 of this title, a statement of dissolution stating the true name of the partnership, the principal office address of the principal office of the partnership, and that the partnership has dissolved and is winding up its business.

A statement of dissolution cancels a filed statement of partnership authority for purposes of section 7-64-303 (3) and is a limitation on authority for purposes of section 7-64-303 (4).

For purposes of sections 7-64-301 and 7-64-804, a person not a partner has notice of the dissolution and the limitation on the partners' authority as a result of the statement of dissolution ninety days after it is filed in the records of the secretary of state.

Notwithstanding dissolution or the filing or recording of a statement of dissolution, a partnership may deliver to the secretary of state, for filing pursuant to part 3 of article 90 of this title, and, if appropriate, record a statement of partnership authority that will operate with respect to a person not a partner as provided in section 7-64-303 (3) and (4) in any transaction, whether or not the transaction is appropriate for winding up the partnership business.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 893, § 1, effective January 1, 1998.

L. 2000:

(1) amended, p. 956, § 33, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

(1) and (4) amended, p. 1826, § 57, effective July 1; (1) and (4) amended, p. 1691, § 55, effective October 1.

L. 2003:

(1) and (3) amended, p. 2254, § 161, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

(1), (2), and (4) amended, p. 1452, § 161, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

(2) amended, p. 851, § 12, effective July 1.

7-64-806. Partner's liability to other partners after dissolution.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section or in section 7-64-306, after dissolution a partner is liable to the other partners for the partner's share of any partnership obligation incurred under section 7-64-804.

A partner who, with knowledge of the dissolution, incurs a partnership obligation under section 7-64-804 (1)(b) by an act that is not appropriate for winding up the partnership business is liable to the partnership for any damage caused to the partnership arising from the obligation.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 893, § 1, effective January 1, 1998.

7-64-807. Settlement of accounts and contributions among partners.

In winding up a partnership's business, the assets of the partnership, including the contributions of the partners required by this section, shall be applied to discharge or provide for partnership obligations to creditors, including, to the extent permitted by law, partners who are creditors. Any surplus shall be applied to pay in cash the net amount distributable to partners in accordance with their right to distributions under subsection (2) of this section.

Each partner is entitled to a settlement of all partnership accounts upon winding up the partnership business. In settling accounts among the partners, the profits and losses that result from the liquidation of the partnership assets shall be credited and charged to the partners' accounts. The partnership shall make a distribution to a partner in an amount equal to any excess of the credits over the charges in the partner's account. A partner shall contribute to the partnership an amount equal to any excess of the charges over the credits in the partner's account.

If a partner fails to contribute, all of the other partners shall contribute, in the proportions in which those partners share partnership losses, the additional amount necessary to discharge or provide for the partnership obligations.

A partner or partner's legal representative may recover from the other partners any contributions the partner makes to the extent the amount contributed exceeds that partner's share of the partnership obligations.

After the settlement of accounts, each partner shall contribute, in the proportion in which the partner shares partnership losses, the amount necessary to discharge or provide for partnership obligations that were not known at the time of the settlement.

The estate of a deceased partner is liable for the partner's obligation to contribute to the partnership.

An assignee for the benefit of creditors of a partnership or a partner, or a person appointed by a court to represent creditors of a partnership or a partner, may enforce a partner's obligation to contribute to the partnership.

Notwithstanding any other subsection of this section, no partner shall be obligated to contribute under this section with respect to any amounts that are attributable to a partnership obligation incurred while the partnership is a limited liability partnership.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 894, § 1, effective January 1, 1998.